District of Columbia statutes.
28-5208

Uniformity.

(a)

If different brands or package sizes of the same consumer commodity are expressed in more than one unit of measure, the retail establishment shall unit price the items consistently.

(b)

When metric units appear on the consumer commodity in addition to other units of measure, the retail establishment may include both units of measure on any stamps, tags, labels, signs, or lists.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132

History